Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1202
Findings.

The Legislature finds that persons attempting to escape from actual or threatened abuse, sexual assault, kidnapping, or stalking frequently establish new addresses in order to prevent their assailants or probable assailants from finding them. The purposes of the Address Confidentiality Act are to enable state and local agencies to respond to requests for public records without disclosing the location of a victim of abuse, sexual assault, kidnapping, or stalking, to enable interagency cooperation with the office of the Secretary of State in providing address confidentiality for victims of abuse, sexual assault, kidnapping, or stalking, and to enable state and local agencies to accept a program participant's use of an address designated by the Secretary of State as a substitute mailing address.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB691, § 1.